Tennessee, session 114, SB1818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or offering for sale of food that
contains forever chemicals, unless the food is labeled as containing forever chemicals
and discloses the known or possible health effects of the chemical. As used in this
subdivision (a)( ), "forever chemical" means a per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance
(PFAS), which is a group of man-made synthetic chemicals, including, but not limited to,
perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA), perfluorooctanesulfonic acid (PFOS), perfluorobutane
sulfonic acid (PFBS), and hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid (HFPO-DA).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1818
011410
- 1 -